Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1226
Standard Specification for Automotive Spark-Ignition Engine Fuel; adoption by reference; sale of fuel; requirements; violations; penalties.

(1) The Legislature hereby adopts by reference the ASTM International publication D4814-24b entitled Standard Specification for Automotive Spark-Ignition Engine Fuel. The Department of Agriculture shall file copies of such publication with the Secretary of State and Clerk of the Legislature.

(2) Commencing on September 3, 2025, all automotive spark-ignition engine fuel sold in Nebraska shall meet the specification as found in the ASTM International publication D4814-24b entitled Standard Specification for Automotive Spark-Ignition Engine Fuel. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for the first such violation and a Class IV felony for all subsequent violations.

(3) For purposes of this section, automotive spark-ignition engine fuel shall mean gasoline and its blends with oxygenates such as alcohol and ethers.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 145;

Laws 1993, LB 440, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB593, § 1.